Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,185
Basic rule; speed.

No person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions and having regard to the actual and potential hazards then existing. A person shall drive at a safe and appropriate speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railroad grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hillcrest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, and when special hazards exist with respect to pedestrians or other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 281.

Operator's license, assessment of points for speeding, see section 60-4,182 et seq.

This section is not unconstitutional. State v. Padley, 195 Neb. 358, 237 N.W.2d 883 (1976).

Unreasonable classification of persons is not created hereby. State ex rel. Douglas v. Gradwohl, 194 Neb. 745, 235 N.W.2d 854 (1975).